Illinois, session 104th, SB586.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Anti-Registry Program Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 185/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Anti-Registry Program Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-1088, eff. 1-1-19.)